en: Iromuji Kimonos
xx: Iromuji Kimonos
cs: Kimona iromuji
da: Ensfarvet kimono (iromuji)
de: Iromuji-Kimonos
es: Kimonos iromuji
fr: Kimonos Iromuji
it: Kimono iromuji
ja: 色無地
nl: Iromuji-kimono's
no: Iromuji-kimonoer
pl: Kimona iromuji
pt: Quimonos Iromuji
ru: Кимоно иромудзи
sv: Iromujikimonor
tr: Iromuji Kimonoları

en: Komon Kimonos
xx: Komon Kimonos
cs: Kimona komon
da: Kimono med fint mønster (komon)
de: Komon-Kimonos
es: Kimonos komon
fr: Kimonos komon
it: Kimono komon
ja: 小紋
nl: Komon-kimono's
no: Komon-kimonoer
pl: Kimona komon
pt: Quimonos komon
ru: Кимоно комон
sv: Komonkimonor
tr: Komon Kimonoları

en: Tomesode & Houmongi Kimonos
xx: Tomesode & Houmongi Kimonos
cs: Kimona tomesode a houmongi
da: Formelle tomesode- og huomongi-kimonoer
de: Tomesode- & Houmongi-Kimonos
es: Kimonos tomesode y houmongi
fr: Kimonos tomesode et homongi
it: Kimono tomesode e houmongi
ja: 留袖・訪問着
nl: Tomesode- en houmongi-kimono's
no: Tomesode- og houmongi-kimonoer
pl: Kimona tomesode i houmongi
pt: Quimonos tomesode e houmongi
ru: Кимоно томесоде и хомонги
sv: Tomesode- och Houmonogikimonor
tr: Tomesode ve Houmongi Kimonoları

en: Religious Ceremonial Clothing
xx: Religious Ceremonial Clothing
cs: Náboženské obřadní oděvy
da: Religiøst ceremonielt tøj
de: Religiöse Festkleidung
es: Ropa para ceremonias religiosas
fr: Vêtements de cérémonie religieuse
it: Abbigliamento cerimonie religiose
ja: 儀式用衣装
nl: Religieuze ceremoniële kleding
no: Religiøse seremoniklær
pl: Stroje na ceremonie religijne
pt: Roupas para cerimônias religiosas
ru: Одежда для религиозных обрядов
sv: Religiösa ceremoniella kläder
tr: Dini Törenlerde Giyilen Kıyafetler

en: Baptism & Communion Dresses
xx: Baptism & Communion Dresses
cs: Šaty ke křtu a přijímání
da: Dåbskjoler og dåbssæt
de: Tauf- & Kommunionskleider
es: Vestidos para bautizos y comuniones
fr: Vêtements de baptême et de communion
it: Vestiti per battesimo e comunione
ja: 洗礼式用ドレス
nl: Doop-/communiejurken en -pakjes
no: Dåpskjoler og dåpssett
pl: Sukienki i komplety do chrztu i komunii
pt: Vestidos para batismo e primeira comunhão
ru: Одежда для крещения
sv: Dopklänningar och nattvardsklänningar
tr: Vaftiz Kıyafetleri ve Setleri

en: Saris & Lehengas
xx: Saris & Lehengas
cs: Sárí a lehenga
da: Sarier
de: Saris
es: Saris
fr: Saris
it: Sari e lehenga
ja: サリー
nl: Sari's\, choli's en rokken
no: Sarier
pl: Sari i lehenga
pt: Sáris
ru: Сари и лехенга
sv: Sarier
tr: Sari'ler

en: Traditional Leather Pants
xx: Traditional Leather Pants
cs: Tradiční kožené kalhoty
da: Traditionelle læderbukser
de: Trachten Lederhosen
es: Pantalones de cuero tradicionales
fr: Lederhosen
it: Pantaloni di pelle tradizionali
ja: トラディショナルレザーパンツ
nl: Traditionele leren broeken
no: Tradisjonelle skinnbukser
pl: Tradycyjne spodnie skórzane
pt: Calças de couro tradicionais
ru: Традиционные кожаные штаны
sv: Traditionella läderbyxor
tr: Geleneksel Deri Pantolonlar

en: Yukata
xx: Yukata
cs: Jukata
da: Yukata
de: Yukata
es: Yukata
fr: Yukata
it: Yukata
ja: 浴衣
nl: Yukata
no: Yukata
pl: Yukata
pt: Yukata
ru: Юката
sv: Yukata
tr: Yukata

en: Underwear & Socks
xx: Underwear & Socks
cs: Spodní prádlo a ponožky
da: Undertøj og sokker
de: Unterwäsche & Socken
es: Ropa interior y calcetines
fr: Sous-vêtements et chaussettes
it: Biancheria intima e calze
ja: 下着・靴下
nl: Ondergoed en sokken
no: Undertøy og sokker
pl: Bielizna i skarpety
pt: Roupas íntimas e meias
ru: Носки и нижнее белье
sv: Underkläder och strumpor
tr: İç Giyim ve Çoraplar

en: Bra Accessories
xx: Bra Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k podprsenkám
da: Tilbehør til bh
de: BH-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para sujetadores
fr: Accessoires pour soutien-gorge
it: Accessori per reggiseni
ja: ブラジャー小物
nl: Accessoires voor bh's
no: Tilbehør til bh
pl: Dodatki do biustonoszy
pt: Acessórios para sutiã
ru: Принадлежности для бюстгальтеров
sv: Bh-tillbehör
tr: Sütyen Aksesuarları

en: Bra Strap Pads
xx: Bra Strap Pads
cs: Podložky pod ramínka podprsenky
da: Puder til bh-stropper
de: BH-Träger-Pads
es: Protectores de hombro para sujetadores
fr: Protège-bretelles de soutien-gorge
it: Imbottiture per reggiseno con velcro
ja: ブラストラップパッド
nl: Pads voor bh-bandjes
no: Puter til bh-stropper
pl: Podkładki pod ramiączka
pt: Protetores para alça de sutiã
ru: Подкладки под бретели бюстгальтеров
sv: Bh-bandsskydd
tr: Sütyen Askısı Pedleri

en: Bra Straps & Extenders
xx: Bra Straps & Extenders
cs: Ramínka podprsenky a prodlužovače
da: Bh-stropper og forlængere
de: BH-Träger & -Erweiterungen
es: Extensores y tirantes para sujetadores
fr: Bretelles et rallonges de soutien-gorge
it: Imbottire ed estensioni per reggiseno
ja: ブラストラップ・延長ホック
nl: Bh-bandjes en -verlengers
no: Bh-stropper og -forlengere
pl: Ramiączka i przedłużki do biustonoszy
pt: Alças de sutiã e extensores
ru: Бретельки и экстендеры для бюстгальтеров
sv: Bh-band och -förlängare
tr: Sütyen Askıları ve Uzatıcıları

en: Breast Enhancing Inserts
xx: Breast Enhancing Inserts
cs: Vycpávky do podprsenek
da: Bh-indlæg
de: BH-Einlagen
es: Realzadores del busto
fr: Amplificateurs de poitrine
it: Imbottiture
ja: ブラパッド
nl: Borstvergroters
no: Bh-innlegg
pl: Wkładki do biustonoszy
pt: Enchimento para sutiãs
ru: Подкладки\, увеличивающие грудь
sv: Bh-inlägg
tr: Göğüs Büyütücü Pedler

en: Breast Petals & Concealers
xx: Breast Petals & Concealers
cs: Kryty bradavek
da: Brystvorteskjulere
de: Brustaufkleber
es: Cubrepezones
fr: Cache-tétons
it: Copri capezzoli e nascondi capezzoli
ja: ニップレス
nl: Tepelstickers en -camouflage
no: Brystvorteskjulere
pl: Osłonki na sutki
pt: Protetores de mamilos
ru: Стикини
sv: Bröstdekorationer och -döljare
tr: Göğüs Ucu Kapatıcılar ve Gizleyiciler

en: Bras
xx: Bras
cs: Podprsenky
da: Bh'er
de: Büstenhalter
es: Sujetadores
fr: Soutiens-gorges, Soutien-gorge
it: Reggiseni
ja: ブラジャー
nl: Bh's
no: Brystholdere
pl: Biustonosze
pt: Sutiãs
ru: Бюстгальтеры
sv: Behåar
tr: Sütyenler

en: Hosiery
xx: Hosiery
cs: Punčochové zboží
da: Trikotage
de: Strumpfhosen
es: Medias
fr: Collants, Collant
it: Calzetteria
ja: ストッキング・タイツ
nl: Panty's
no: Strømpebukser
pl: Wyroby pończosznicze
pt: Meias-calças
ru: Чулочно-носочные изделия
sv: Strumpor och trikåer
tr: Kadın Çorapları

en: Jock Straps
xx: Jock Straps
cs: Suspenzory
da: Skridtbind
de: Suspensorien
es: Suspensorios
fr: Slips de sport
it: Sospensori
ja: ジョックストラップ
nl: Jockstraps
no: Suspensorier
pl: Suspensoria
pt: Protetores genitais
ru: Суспензории
sv: Suspensoar
tr: Suspansuarlar

en: Lingerie
xx: Lingerie
cs: Dámské prádlo
da: Lingerie
de: Dessous
es: Lencería
fr: Lingerie
it: Lingerie
ja: ランジェリー
nl: Lingerie
no: Dameundertøy
pl: Bielizna damska
pt: Lingerie
ru: Женское белье
sv: Damunderkläder
tr: Kadın İç Çamaşırları

en: Lingerie Accessories
xx: Lingerie Accessories
cs: Doplňky k dámskému prádlu
da: Tilbehør til lingerie
de: Dessous-Accessoires
es: Accesorios de lencería
fr: Accessoires de lingerie
it: Accessori lingerie
ja: ランジェリー小物
nl: Accessoires voor lingerie
no: Tilbehør til dameundertøy
pl: Dodatki do bielizny
pt: Acessórios de lingerie
ru: Принадлежности для женского белья
sv: Tillbehör till damunderkläder
tr: Kadın İç Çamaşırı Aksesuarları

en: Garter Belts
xx: Garter Belts
cs: Podvazkové pásy
da: Hofteholdere og strømpeholdere
de: Strumpfhalter
es: Ligueros
fr: Porte-jarretelles
it: Reggicalze
ja: ガーターベルト
nl: Jarretelgordels
no: Hofteholdere
pl: Pasy do podwiązek
pt: Ligas para meias
ru: Пояса с резинками
sv: Strumpebandshållare
tr: Jartiyer Lastikleri